Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1612
Limitation of action.

Any action to enforce a claim for damages under section 59-1609 shall be forever barred unless commenced within four years after the cause of action accrues; Provided, that whenever any action is brought by the Attorney General for a violation of sections 59-1602 to 59-1606, except actions for the recovery of a civil penalty for violation of an injunction or actions under section 59-1609, the running of such statute of limitations, with respect to every private right of action for damages under section 59-1609 which is based in whole or part on any matter complained of in the action by the Attorney General, shall be suspended during the pendency thereof.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 19.